Tennessee, session 114, HB0481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5501(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(N) One (1) state employee who has experience in the field of cybersecurity, to
be appointed by the governor;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5501(b)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) The persons appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(L)-(N) are nonvoting
members of the council.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-5501(c)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) Members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(F), (G), (H), (I), (J), (L),
(M), and (N) are eligible for reappointment to the council.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0481
001944
- 1 -